Utah statutes.
76-10-101.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Cigar" means a product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of any roll of tobacco wrapped in leaf tobacco, or in any substance containing tobacco, other than any roll of tobacco that is a cigarette as described in Subsection (2).

(2)  "Cigarette" means a product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of:

(a)  any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco; or

(b)  any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in Subsection (2)(a).

(3)  "Electronic cigarette" means any device, other than a cigarette or cigar, intended to deliver vapor containing nicotine into a person's respiratory system.

(4)  "Place of business" includes:

(a)  a shop;

(b)  a store;

(c)  a factory;

(d)  a public garage;

(e)  an office;

(f)  a theater;

(g)  a recreation hall;

(h)  a dance hall;

(i)  a poolroom;

(j)  a café;

(k)  a cafeteria;

(l)  a cabaret;

(m)  a restaurant;

(n)  a hotel;

(o)  a lodging house;

(p)  a streetcar;

(q)  a bus;

(r)  an interurban or railway passenger coach;

(s)  a waiting room; and

(t)  any other place of business.

(5)  "Smoking" means the possession of any lighted cigar, cigarette, pipe, or other lighted smoking equipment.

